Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1301
Jails; rules concerning cross-gender supervision and searches.

Each county and city jail shall comply with the rules and regulations of the Jail Standards Board concerning cross-gender supervision and cross-gender searches of inmates.

Laws 2026, LB1195, § 2.
July 18, 2026